District of Columbia statutes.
12-307

Foreign judgments.

An action upon a judgment or decree rendered in a State, territory, commonwealth or possession of the United States or in a foreign country is barred if by the laws of that jurisdiction, the action would there be barred and the judgment or decree would be incapable of being otherwise enforced there.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 12-308.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 12-307.
1973 Ed., § 12-307.